California statutes. Education Code
A member of the Defined Benefit Program shall not be required to pay contributions under this part to receive credit for service under Section 22805 under any of the following conditions:

(a) The service was performed after September 15, 1940, and the member returned to employment subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program prior to March 19, 1948.

(b) The service was performed prior to January 1, 1950, and the member was continuously performing the service prior to that date and returned to employment subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program within six months following the termination of the service.

(c) The service was performed prior to September 14, 1978, and the member entered that service after December 31, 1949, and returned to employment subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program within six months following the termination of the service.

(d) The service was performed prior to January 1, 1992, and the member entered that service after August 1, 1990, and retired or returned to employment subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program and earned additional service credit within six months following the termination of that service or within six months after the completion of any period of rehabilitation offered by the United States government, excluding rehabilitation solely for educational purposes. Notwithstanding Section 22250, 22251, or 22253, employers of members subject to this section shall not be required to make the contributions required by Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 22950).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22809.

A member of the Defined Benefit Program may elect to receive credit under this part for teaching service performed within and outside of this state in a war relocation center administered by the Wartime Civil Control Administration if all of the following conditions exist:

(a) By reason of the member’s Japanese ancestry the member was placed in a war relocation center prior to becoming a member of the Defined Benefit Program.

(b) The member earned compensation for service in a teaching capacity in the relocation center.

(c) The member possessed a valid California teaching credential issued by the State Department of Education or had a bachelor’s degree in education from a California postsecondary institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22810.

(a) Any member of the Defined Benefit Program, who was a member of the program on June 30, 1944, may elect to receive credit under this part for the following service performed prior to July 1, 1944, in other states, territories, or possessions of the United States, or in Canada:

(1) Service in a teaching position that in this state would be subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program.

(2) Service in a teaching position in a publicly supported and administered university or college.

(3) Service in a teaching position with the Civilian Conservation Corps or in an Indian school supported and administered by the United States government.

(4) Service in a publicly supported residential school for the deaf or the blind.

(b) In no event shall the member receive credit for this service if the member has received or is eligible to receive credit for the same service in another retirement system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 98.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22811.

Pursuant to terms and conditions established by the board, members may transfer funds from eligible retirement plans into the Teachers’ Retirement Fund to purchase service credit or redeposit previously refunded contributions pursuant to this chapter, Chapter 14.2 (commencing with Section 22820), Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 22850), and Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 23200), to the extent that the transfer is allowable under, and is completed in a manner prescribed by, applicable federal and state law and any related regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 803, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.2. Out-of-State Service Credit [22820. - 22829.]

22820.

(a) A member, other than a retired member, may request to purchase out-of-state service credit for any of the following:

(1) Service performed in a position while employed by a public educational institution located in another state or territory of the United States.

(2) Educational service performed as an employee of the United States.

(3) Service performed as an employee of an educational institution located outside of the United States and its territories that receives a portion of its funding from any foreign or domestic public sources and provides a level of education comparable to
 kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, as determined by the applicable law of the jurisdiction in which the educational institution is located.

(4) As an employee of an educational institution that receives funds under Section 2701 of Title 22 of the United States Code.

(b) The member may not receive credit for this service if the member retains or is eligible to receive credit for the same service in the Cash Balance Benefit Program under Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) or another public retirement system, excluding social security.

(c) The amount of out-of-state service credit a member may purchase may not exceed the number of years of service performed by the member in a position described in subdivision (a).

(d) Out-of-state service
 credit may be purchased under this section by means of any of the following actions:

(1) Paying an amount equal to the amount refunded from the other public retirement system and receiving service credit under the Defined Benefit Program pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22823.

(2) Paying the contributions required under the Defined Benefit Program pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22823 for the service credited in the other public retirement system.

(3) Paying an amount equal to the amount refunded from the other public retirement system and an additional amount in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 22823 for the service credited in the other public retirement system.

(4) Paying the contributions required under the Defined Benefit
 Program pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22823 for the service not credited to a public retirement system.

(e) Compensation for out-of-state service may not be used in determining the highest average annual compensation earnable when calculating final compensation.

(f) The service credit purchased under this section may not be used to meet the eligibility requirements for benefits provided under Sections 24001 and 24101.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 304, Sec. 10.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

22821.

A member’s request to purchase out-of-state service credit pursuant to this chapter shall be submitted in writing and shall include information as required by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 304, Sec. 11.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

22822.

A request pursuant to Section 22820 to purchase out-of-state service credit may be made by a member any time prior to the effective date of a family, survivor, disability, or retirement allowance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 304, Sec. 12.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

22823.

A member who requests to purchase out-of-state service credit pursuant to Section 22820 shall pay, prior to retirement, all contributions with respect to that service at the contribution rate for additional service credit adopted by the board as a plan amendment, in effect on the date of the request, in accordance with subdivisions (a), (f), (g), and (h) of Section 22801.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 304, Sec. 13.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

22824.

No provision of this chapter shall apply to the extent it would require any action to be taken that would create a conflict with Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1968 (Title 26 of the United States Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 569, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.   Section operative January 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 22825.)
-------------------------------------------

22825.

This chapter shall become operative on January 1, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 569, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (January 1, 1999) for Chapter 14.2, commencing with Section 22820.)
-------------------------------------------

22826.

(a) A member, other than a retired member, may request to purchase up to five years of nonqualified service credit provided the member is vested in the Defined Benefit Program as provided in Section 22156.

(b) A member who requests to purchase nonqualified service credit as provided in this chapter shall contribute to the retirement fund the actuarial cost of the service, including interest as appropriate, as determined by the board based on the most recent valuation of the plan with respect to the Defined Benefit Program in effect on the date of the request, in accordance with subdivisions (a), (f), (g), and (h) of Section 22801.

(c) This section shall apply only to an application to purchase nonqualified service credit on a properly executed form provided by the system and received at the system’s headquarters office prior to January 1, 2013, that is subsequently approved by the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 21.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22827.

(a) A member who retired for service between June 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, inclusive, may elect to purchase credit for out-of-state service for either of the following:

(1) Service performed as an employee of an educational institution located outside of the United States and its territories that receives a portion of its funding from any foreign or domestic public sources and provides a level of education comparable to kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, as determined by the applicable law of the jurisdiction in which the educational institution is located.

(2) As an employee of an educational institution that receives funds under Section 2701 of Title 22 of the United States Code.

(b) The member may not receive credit for service pursuant to this section if the member retains or is eligible to receive credit for the same service in the Cash Benefit Program under Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) or another public retirement system, excluding social security.

(c) The amount of service for which a member may purchase credit may not exceed the number of years of service performed by the member in a position described in subdivision (a) prior to that member’s effective retirement date.

(d) Compensation for out-of-state service may not be used in determining the highest average annual compensation earnable when calculating final compensation.

(e) The service credit purchased pursuant to this section may not be used to meet the eligibility requirements for benefits provided pursuant to Sections 24001 and 24101.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 494, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

22828.

A request to purchase out-of-state service credit pursuant to Section 22827 must be received no later than June 30, 2009.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 22.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22829.

(a) This section applies only to a member who elects to receive out-of-state service credit pursuant to Section 22827.

(b) The member shall pay all contributions with respect to that service at the contribution rate for additional service credit adopted by the board as a plan amendment in effect at the time of election.

(c) Contributions shall be based upon the member’s age at the date of the election and upon compensation earnable in the last school year of credited service or either of the two immediately preceding school years, whichever is highest.

(d) Any payment that a member may make to the system to obtain credit for out-of-state service shall be paid in full before a member or beneficiary may receive any adjustment in the appropriate allowance due date because of that payment.

(e) The system shall make any appropriate adjustments to the member’s benefit allowance to reflect the purchase of additional service retroactive to the effective date of retirement.

(f) Contributions for out-of-state service credit shall be made in a lump sum.

(g) If the payment election described in subdivision (b) is not received at the system’s headquarters office within 30 days of receiving a bill for this purchase from the system, the election shall be canceled.

(h) If the election to purchase
 out-of-state service is canceled as described in subdivision (g), the member may, prior to June 30, 2009, make a new election to purchase out-of-state service pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 14.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.5. Military Service [22850. - 22856.]

22850.

(a) The Legislature hereby declares its intent to provide benefits under this part to reemployed members who have been absent from a position of employment subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program to perform service in the uniformed services of the United States in accordance with the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994 (Chapter 43 (commencing with Section 4301) of Title 38 of the United States Code).

(b) The system shall comply with Chapter 43 (commencing with Section 4301) of Title 38 of the United States Code, as that chapter may be amended from time to time.

(c) “Service in
 the uniformed services,” for purposes of determining plan vesting, eligibility for membership, and accrual of benefits, means the performance of duty on a voluntary or involuntary basis in a uniformed service under competent authority and includes active duty, active duty for training, initial active duty for training, inactive duty training, a period for which a member is absent from a position of employment for the purpose of an examination to determine the fitness of the member to perform any duty, and the period of time following the actual service in the uniformed service through the last day a member is eligible to report back to work or to apply for reemployment as specified under Section 1002.259 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) “Uniformed services” means the Armed Forces of the United States of America, the Army National Guard and the Air National Guard when engaged in active duty for training, inactive duty
 training, or full-time National Guard duty, the commissioned corps of the United States Public Health Service, and any other category of persons designated by the President in time of war or emergency.

(e) Except as provided in Section 22851, no benefit shall accrue during the period of service in the uniformed services if the member does not return to employment, with the same employer which had employed the member immediately prior to the eligible period of service in the uniformed services, as prescribed in Chapter 43 (commencing with Section 4301) of Title 38 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 18.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22851.

The right to pension benefits under this part of a member who dies or who returns to employment with the same employer which had employed the member immediately prior to the eligible period of service in the uniformed services, and is subject to Chapter 43 (commencing with Section 4301) of Title 38 of the United States Code shall be determined under this section.

(a) (1) A reemployed or deceased member shall be treated as not having incurred a break in service by reason of that member’s eligible period or periods of service in the uniformed services.

(2) (A) Each eligible period of service served by a member in the uniformed services
 shall, upon return to employment, with the same employer which had employed the member immediately prior to the eligible period of service in the uniformed services, or upon death, be deemed to constitute service with the employer or employers toward plan vesting and eligibility for membership in the Defined Benefit Program. Service that is deemed to the member pursuant to this subparagraph shall not be used for benefit calculations.

(B) In cases of death during qualified military service or if a member fails to remit the member contributions that would have been required in respect of the eligible period of service in the uniformed services, service shall be used exclusively for plan vesting and eligibility for membership purposes. Service that is deemed to the member pursuant to this subparagraph shall not be used for benefit calculations.

(3) (A) Each
 eligible period of service served by a member in the uniformed services shall, upon his or her payment of the member contributions required under this part, be deemed to constitute service for the purposes of accruing benefits in the Defined Benefit Program and the Defined Benefit Supplement Program. 

(B) A member who returns to employment, with the same employer which had employed the member immediately prior to the eligible period of service in the uniformed services shall not be entitled to any benefits under this part in respect of service in the uniformed services to which the member would not otherwise have been entitled had the member remained continuously employed and not undertaken such service in the uniformed services.

(b) For purposes of accruing benefits in the Defined Benefit Program and Defined Benefit Supplement Program, a member who returns to employment with the
 same employer which had employed the member immediately prior to the eligible period of service in the uniformed services shall be entitled to service credit, compensation earnable, contributions, interest, and additional earnings credits under this part for the eligible period of service in the uniformed services upon his or her payment of the member contributions required under Section 22901 and Section 22901.7, if applicable, that otherwise would have been due for such period of service had the member remained continuously employed and not undertaken such service in the uniformed services. No such payment of member contributions may exceed the amount the member would have been required to contribute under this part had the member not served in the uniformed services and had remained continuously employed by the employer throughout the eligible period of service in the uniformed services. If a member fails to remit the member contributions that would have been required under Section 22901 and Section
 22901.7 if applicable, in respect of the eligible period of service in the uniformed services no benefits shall be provided under this part for the period to which the omitted contributions relate.

(c) Any payment of member contributions to the Defined Benefit Program or the Defined Benefit Supplement Program in this section shall be made by the member during the period beginning with the date of return to employment and may continue for three times the period of the member’s eligible service in the uniformed services, not to exceed five years. Any payment of member contributions to the Defined Benefit Program in this section by a member who returned to employment prior to January 1, 1997, and qualifies for benefits in accordance with the federal Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994 (38 U.S.C. Secs. 4301 to 4335, incl.) shall be made by the member during the period beginning with the date of notification of
 eligibility by the employer to the system and may continue for three times the period of the member’s eligible service in the uniformed services, not to exceed five years. Any subsequent request to purchase service credit for this service shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 22800). If all contributions due under this part are not paid to the plan with respect to the Defined Benefit Program within the specified repayment period and in accordance with subdivision (b), the member shall be entitled to the benefits attributable to the contributions received or may request a return of his or her payments. Credited interest on member contributions made for the eligible period of service in the uniformed services shall not be credited under this part until after the contributions due are paid and then only prospectively to the member’s account in accordance with Section 22216. For the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, contributions, interest, and additional earnings credits
 the member would have earned had the member remained continuously employed during the period of eligible service in the uniformed services shall be credited retroactively after all contributions due are paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 19.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22852.

(a) An employer reemploying a member of the Defined Benefit Program with service subject to the requirements of Chapter 43 (commencing with Section 4301) of Title 38 of the United States Code shall be liable to the plan for the employer contributions under this part, provided that employer was the last employer employing the member immediately prior to the period served by the member in the uniformed services.

(b) For purposes of determining the amount of that liability under this part and any obligation to the plan with respect to the Defined Benefit Program, interest shall not be included in the liability to the plan.

(c) Subject to subdivision (e), the employer shall pay the employer contributions for the eligible period of service in the uniformed services that would have been required under Sections 22950, 22950.5, and 22951 had the member remained continuously employed during that period of eligible service in the uniformed services.

(d) In addition to any amount required pursuant to subdivision (c), the employer shall pay the full cost of any interest and additional earnings credits credited to the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 22851. 

(e) The employer shall not be liable for employer contributions under this part for the eligible period of service in the uniformed services to the extent that the member fails to remit the member contributions for that period.

(f) The employer shall provide information regarding the reemployment of a member who is subject to Chapter 43 (commencing with Section 4301) of Title 38 of the United States Code on a form prescribed by the system within 30 days of the date of reemployment.

(g) Employers shall remit to the plan with respect to the Defined Benefit Program and the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, the employer contributions required under subdivisions (c) and (d) within 60 working days of the date the system notifies the employer of the amount of contributions due with respect to the member who elects to remit the member contributions for the eligible period of service in the uniformed services.

(h) If the employee does not comply with subdivision (b) of Section 22851 within the time period specified, the employer contributions that were remitted for that period shall be adjusted
 pursuant to Section 23008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 20.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22853.

For purposes of this chapter, creditable compensation during the period of service in the uniformed services shall be computed as follows:

(a) The creditable compensation the member would have received for the eligible period of service had the member remained continuously employed.

(b) In the event the creditable compensation is not reasonably certain, creditable compensation shall be based on the member’s average creditable compensation during the 12-month period immediately preceding the eligible period of service in the uniformed services or, if shorter, the period of employment immediately preceding that period of
 service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 21.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22853.5.

For purposes of this chapter, compensation earnable during the period of service in the uniformed services shall be computed as follows:

(a) The compensation earnable that would have been applicable for the eligible period of service had the member remained continuously employed.

(b) In the event the compensation earnable that would have been applicable is not reasonably certain, compensation earnable shall be based on the member’s compensation earnable earned during the 12-month period immediately preceding the eligible period of service in the uniformed services or, if shorter, the period of employment immediately preceding that period of service prorated over the period of
 service in the uniformed services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 22.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22854.

A reemployed member who has been absent from a position of employment subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program to perform service in the uniformed services, pursuant to Section 22850, for a period in excess of five years shall not be entitled to benefits or credit for plan vesting or eligibility for membership purposes under this chapter for an amount exceeding five years, except where the service in the uniformed services has exceeded five years for the following reasons:

(a) The member is required to serve beyond five years to complete an initial period of obligated service.

(b) The member was unable to obtain orders releasing
 the member from a period of service in the uniformed services before the expiration of the five-year period and that inability was through no fault of the member.

(c) The member served in the uniformed services as required pursuant to Section 270 of Title 10 of the United States Code, Section 502(a) or 503 of Title 32 of the United States Code, or to fulfill additional training requirements determined and certified in writing by the Secretary of Defense, to be necessary for professional development, or for completion of skill training or retraining.

(d) The member is ordered to do any of the following:

(1) Ordered to or retained on active duty under Section 672(a), 672(g), 673, 673(b), 673(c), or 688 of Title 10 of the United States Code or under Section 331, 332, 359, 360, 367, or 712 of Title 14 of the United
 States Code.

(2) Ordered to or retained on active duty, other than for training, under any provision of law during a war or during a national emergency declared by the President or the Congress.

(3) Ordered to active duty, other than for training, in support, as determined by the secretary concerned, of an operational mission for which personnel have been ordered to active duty under Section 673(b) of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(4) Ordered to active duty in support, as determined by the secretary concerned, of a critical mission or requirement of the uniformed services.

(5) Called into federal service as a member of the National Guard under Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 331) of Title 10 of the United States Code or under Section 3500 or
 8500 of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 23.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22855.

A member of the Defined Benefit Program shall have no right to the benefits under this part otherwise accorded under this chapter in respect of service in the uniformed services upon the occurrence of any of the following events:

(a) A separation of the member from the uniformed service with a dishonorable or bad conduct discharge.

(b) A separation of the member from the uniformed service under other than honorable conditions, as characterized pursuant to regulations prescribed by the secretary concerned.

(c) A dismissal of the member permitted under Section 1161(a) of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(d) A dropping of the member from the rolls pursuant to Section 1161(b) of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 106.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22856.

No provision of this chapter shall apply to the extent it would require any action to be taken that would cause the plan or its members under this part to incur adverse tax consequences under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Title 26 of the United States Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 107.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Employee Contributions [22900. - 22909.]

22900.

By accepting employment to perform creditable service, a person consents to make contributions pursuant to Sections 22901 and 22901.7 for service and compensation credited under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 13.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22901.

(a) Each member of the Defined Benefit Program shall contribute to the retirement fund an amount equivalent to 8 percent of the member’s creditable compensation, unless he or she is a member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013.

(b) Each member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013 shall contribute to the retirement fund an amount equivalent to the percentage of the member’s creditable compensation calculated as follows:

(1) An initial percentage equal to 50 percent of the normal cost rate of benefits applicable to members subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013,
 rounded to the nearest quarter of 1 percent. The normal cost rate shall be adopted by the board.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), once established, the percentage described in paragraph (1) shall not be adjusted on account of a change to the normal cost rate, as adopted by the board, unless the normal cost rate increases or decreases by more than 1 percent of payroll above or below the normal cost rate in effect at the time the percentage is first established or, if later, the normal cost rate in effect at the time of the last adjustment. 

(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 7522.30 of the Government Code, this subdivision shall not be subject to the collective bargaining process.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 22905, any member contributions for service performed during the 2010–11 school year with a
 service period ending after December 31, 2010, shall be credited pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 15.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

22901.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 22901, the normal rate of contribution for a “state employee,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 3513 of the Government Code, who is a member of the Defined Benefit Program, may be established by a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 3517.5 of the Government Code. The memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of the memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions may not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(b) The Director of Human Resources may establish the normal rate of contribution for a state employee who is a member of
 the Defined Benefit Program who is excepted from the definition of “state employee” in subdivision (c) of Section 3513 of the Government Code, and an officer or employee of the executive branch of state government who is not a member of the civil service. The normal rate of contribution shall be the same for all members identified in this subdivision. The contribution rate shall be effective the beginning of the pay period indicated by the Director of Human Resources but shall be no earlier than the beginning of the pay period following the date the board receives notification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 7.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

22901.7.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2014, the amount of contributions required under subdivision (a) of Section 22901 and Section 22901.3 as it applies to a member who is not subject to the Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013 shall increase by the percentage of the member’s compensation that is creditable to the Defined Benefit Program as follows: 

(1) On July 1, 2014, by 0.15 percent.

(2) On July 1, 2015, by 1.20 percent.

(3) On July 1, 2016, by 2.25 percent.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2014, the amount of contributions required under subdivision (b) of
 Section 22901 and Section 22901.3 as it applies to members who are subject to the Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013 shall increase by the following percentages of the member’s compensation that is creditable to the Defined Benefit Program as follows: 

(1) On July 1, 2014, by 0.15 percent.

(2) On July 1, 2015, by 0.56 percent.

(3) On July 1, 2016, by 1.205 percent.

(c) The act adding this section establishes the improvement factor provided pursuant to Sections 22140 and 22141 as a vested benefit pursuant to a contractually enforceable promise and a comparable new advantage in exchange for the contribution increases made pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 47, Sec. 5.   (AB 1469)   Effective June 24, 2014.   Adding action may become inoperative under conditions prescribed by Stats. 2014, Ch. 47, Sec. 13, subds. (b), (c), and (d).)
-------------------------------------------

22902.

Members’ accumulated retirement contributions and those other contributions required for credited service under this part shall be in the amounts required based on rates of contribution applicable for the years included in that period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 110.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22903.

Notwithstanding Sections 22901, 22901.3, 22901.7, 22956, and 23000, the state and each school district, community college district, county board of education, and county superintendent of schools, may pick up, for the sole purpose of deferring taxes, as authorized by Section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 414(h)(2)) and Section 17501 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, all of the contributions required to be paid under this part by a member of the Defined Benefit Program, provided that the contributions are deducted from the creditable compensation of the
 member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 14.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22904.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state may pick up all or a portion of the contributions required to be paid under this part by a state employee who is a member of the Defined Benefit Program, provided that the contributions are deducted from the creditable compensation of the member. The pickup of member contributions shall be through a salary reduction program pursuant to Section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C.A. Sec. 414(h)(2)). These contributions shall be reported as employer-paid member contributions, and shall be credited to the account of the member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 112.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22905.

(a) Member contributions pursuant to Sections 22901, 22901.3, and 22901.7, employer contributions pursuant to Section 22903 or 22904, and member contributions made by an employer pursuant to Section 22909 shall be credited to the member’s individual account under the Defined Benefit Program or the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, whichever is applicable pursuant to the provisions of this part.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (e), member and employer contributions, exclusive of contributions pursuant to Sections 22901.7, 22950.5, and 22951, on a member’s compensation under the following circumstances shall be credited to the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account:

(1) Compensation for creditable service that exceeds one year in a school year shall be credited effective on the July 1 immediately following the period for which the compensation is earned.

(2) Compensation that is determined by the system to have been paid to enhance a member’s benefits pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 22119.2 or to not reflect sound principles that support the integrity of the retirement fund pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 22119.2 shall be credited effective as of the earliest day contributions are due in the office pursuant to Section 23002.

(3) Compensation that is paid for a limited number of times as specified by law, a collective bargaining agreement, or an employment agreement
 shall be credited effective as of the earliest day contributions are due in the office pursuant to Section 23002.

(c) A member shall not make voluntary pretax or posttax contributions under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program nor may a member redeposit amounts previously distributed based on the balance in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account.

(d) Any contributions on compensation that is creditable to the Defined Benefit Supplement account shall be limited to the contributions made pursuant to Sections 22901, 22901.3, 22950, and 22951. Any excess member contributions, as determined by the system, shall be returned to the member through the employer and any excess employer contributions shall be returned to the employer.

(e) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (b) shall not apply to a member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013.

(f) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become inoperative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1), and this section shall be repealed on July 1,
 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 21.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 22 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 690.)
-------------------------------------------

22905.
